Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2515.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commercial Data Center Transparency Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person or entity that files, or on whose behalf a person files, an application with a permitting authority for a permit, approval, certification or authorization for a commercial data center project."Commercial data center." A facility, campus of facilities 12345678910111213141516171819 or array of interconnected facilities in this Commonwealth that is used to house and operate equipment that receives, stores, aggregates, manages, processes, transforms, retrieves, researches or transmits data and that has a peak demand of 25 megawatts or greater."Commercial data center project." The siting, development, construction, expansion or operation of a commercial data center, including associated utility or energy infrastructure, water supply infrastructure, wastewater infrastructure and site work, to the extent the components are subject to an approval, permit or authorization by a permitting authority."Commonwealth permitting authority." A department, agency, independent agency, board or commission of the Commonwealth that issues a permit, approval, certification, authorization or other governmental permission required for the construction or operation of a commercial data center project."Consumptive use." The portion of water withdrawn or diverted for a commercial data center project that is lost, diverted out of a basin or otherwise not returned to the waters of the basin from which the water was withdrawn, as determined by the applicable permitting authority."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Electric distribution company." An electric distribution company as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions)."Interstate river basin commission." The term shall include the:(1) Delaware River Basin Commission.(2) Susquehanna River Basin Commission.20260HB2515PN3401 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Permitting authority." A Commonwealth permitting authority or an interstate river basin commission."Public utility." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Water use." A new or increased withdrawal, diversion or consumptive use of water associated with a commercial data center project, measured as an average daily quantity, stated in gallons per day, during any consecutive 30-day period.Section 3. Disclosure in applications.(a) Disclosure.--An applicant shall state in the application that the application is for a commercial data center project, in the manner required by the Commonwealth permitting authority.(b) Applications covered.--Subsection (a) applies to applications filed with a Commonwealth permitting authority relating to:(1) water withdrawal, diversion or consumptive use;(2) wastewater treatment or disposal;(3) air quality;(4) storm water, erosion or sediment control;(5) highway occupancy permits or other transportation approvals; and(6) any other permit, approval, certification or authorization required for the construction or operation of a commercial data center project.(c) False statement.--A person who knowingly fails to make the disclosure required under subsection (a), or knowingly makes a materially false statement related to the disclosure, is subject to enforcement under section 9.Section 4. Water use transparency.(a) Applicability.--This section shall apply to a commercial 20260HB2515PN3401 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 data center project if the commercial data center, including any existing facility, addition, expansion or phase of development of the data center, has:(1) water use of more than 100,000 gallons per day; or(2) consumptive water use of 20,000 gallons per day or more.(b) Administration.--The department shall administer this section and may consult with other Commonwealth permitting authorities.(c) Submission by applicant.--(1) For a project subject to subsection (a), the applicant shall submit to the department, in a form prescribed by the department:(i) the proposed maximum daily water use for the entire commercial data center, including any existing facility, addition, expansion or phase of development, stated in gallons per day, and whether the project includes withdrawal, diversion, consumptive use or a combination withdrawal, diversion or consumptive use;(ii) the source or sources of water supply;(iii) measures to minimize water use, including reuse or recycling, if proposed; and(iv) whether the commercial data center project requires review or approval by an interstate river basin commission under the applicable rules or regulations of the commission and, if applicable, the status of the applicant's submission to or approval by the commission.(2) The applicant shall provide a copy of the submission under paragraph (1) to the county and local municipality in which the commercial data center project is proposed to be 20260HB2515PN3401 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 located.(d) Timing of submission.--The submission required under subsection (c) shall be made within five business days after the applicant files an application with a Commonwealth permitting authority under section 3 for the commercial data center project. If the applicant submits an amended application, revised application, permit amendment, permit modification or other change to an application for the commercial data center project that changes the information required under subsection (c), the applicant shall submit a revised submission to the department within five business days after filing the amended application, revised application, permit amendment, permit modification or other change. Upon receipt of a revised submission under this subsection, the department shall treat the revised submission as a new submission for purposes of subsection (e).(e) Public posting.--The department shall:(1) Within 10 business days after receipt of a complete submission or revised submission under subsection (c) or (d):(i) post the submission or revised submission and a plain-language summary in accordance with subsection (f) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website; and(ii) transmit a copy of the plain-language summary to the county and local municipality in which the commercial data center project is proposed to be located.(2) Accept written public comments for not less than 90 days after posting.(f) Plain-language summary.--The summary required under subsection (e)(1) shall include:20260HB2515PN3401 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) the proposed maximum daily water use;(2) the source or sources of water supply;(3) an explanation of consumptive use, if applicable;(4) measures to minimize water use, including reuse or recycling, if proposed; and(5) how to submit comments and obtain additional information.(g) Public comments.--The department shall transmit comments received within the comment period under subsection (e)(2) to each Commonwealth permitting authority reviewing an application for the commercial data center project and shall maintain the comments as part of the public record.(h) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) expand or limit the substantive permitting jurisdiction of the department, another Commonwealth permitting authority or an interstate river basin commission; or(2) replace or modify public notice or public comment requirements otherwise applicable to a permit, approval, certification or authorization under other law.Section 5. Coordination.(a) Interstate river basin commissions.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede or limit the authority of an interstate river basin commission or the applicability of commission review where otherwise required.(b) Documentation of commission status.--For a commercial data center project subject to review by an interstate river basin commission, an applicant shall provide to the Commonwealth permitting authority documentation demonstrating:20260HB2515PN3401 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) submission to the applicable commission; and(2) where required, approval by the applicable commission or the status of review.(c) Condition on final Commonwealth action.--A Commonwealth permitting authority may require documentation under subsection (b) as a condition of final action on a permit, approval, certification or authorization materially related to water use for the commercial data center project.Section 6. Utility cost transparency and commission oversight.(a) Utility statement required upon request.--Upon written request of a municipality or a Commonwealth permitting authority, the serving electric distribution company shall provide a written statement, based on information reasonably available to the electric distribution company at the time of the statement, identifying:(1) the anticipated peak demand for the commercial data center, stated in megawatts;(2) a general description of distribution facilities reasonably anticipated to be required primarily to serve the commercial data center;(3) the manner in which the costs of such facilities are expected to be assigned under tariffs, service agreements or commission-approved cost allocation mechanisms; and(4) whether any costs described under paragraph (3) may be recovered from retail electric customers other than the commercial data center customer and, if so, a general description of the class or classes of customers from which the costs may be recovered.(b) Commission oversight.--The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission shall, in exercising its authority under 66 Pa.C.S. 20260HB2515PN3401 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to public utilities), ensure that commission-approved tariffs and cost allocation mechanisms appropriately assign to commercial data center customers the reasonable costs of facilities required primarily to serve commercial data center load, to the extent permitted by law.(c) Confidential security information.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require disclosure of confidential security information protected under the act of November 29, 2006 (P.L.1435, No.156), known as the Public Utility Confidential Security Information Disclosure Protection Act, or regulations adopted thereunder.Section 7. Transportation-related noise mitigation.(a) Applicability.--This section shall apply to:(1) a Department of Transportation highway project that is undertaken primarily to serve a commercial data center project, as determined by the Department of Transportation; or(2) mitigation required as a condition of a highway occupancy permit issued by the Department of Transportation under 67 Pa. Code Ch. 441 that is undertaken primarily to serve a commercial data center project, as determined by the Department of Transportation.(b) Consideration of noise mitigation.--For a project under subsection (a), the Department of Transportation shall:(1) evaluate noise mitigation measures, including barriers, berms, vegetative buffers, natural buffers and other similar measures; and(2) where practicable and consistent with applicable Federal requirements and department standards, incorporate appropriate noise mitigation measures into the project 20260HB2515PN3401 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 design.Section 8. Municipal zoning.Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a municipality to permit or provide for a commercial data center or commercial data center project under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, or under any other law governing local land use.Section 9. Enforcement.(a) Attorney General.--The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce this act in Commonwealth Court.(b) Injunctive relief.--In addition to any other remedy available under law, the court may grant injunctive relief to restrain a violation of this act.(c) Civil penalty.--A person or entity who knowingly violates section 3 commits a civil violation and may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 per violation. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.(d) Permit-related enforcement.--The submission of false or misleading information under section 3 or 4, or the failure to provide or update information required under section 3 or 4, shall constitute grounds for denial, suspension, modification or revocation of a permit, approval, certification or authorization for the commercial data center project by the permitting authority in accordance with applicable law.(e) Other enforcement.--Nothing in this section limits the enforcement authority of a permitting authority under any other law.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2515PN3401 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829